Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3457.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 10.49, is amended to read: 10.49 NAMING. Laws enacted on or after July 1, deleted text begin 2009deleted text end new text begin 2025new text end , must not be named for deleted text begin livingdeleted text end people, and laws may not name councils, buildings, roads, or other facilities or entities after living people. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end